District of Columbia statutes.
4-1702.01

Access to Justice Initiative.

(a)

The Office of the Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and Justice shall establish an Access to Justice Initiative program for the purpose of providing support to nonprofit organizations that deliver civil legal services to low-income and under-served District residents and providing loan-repayment assistance to lawyers working in eligible employment. The Initiative shall consist of the ATJ and LRAP programs.

(b)

The provisions of this chapter shall be exempt from the requirements of part B of subchapter XII-A of Chapter 3 of Title 1 [§ 1-328.11 et seq.].

History

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 201
as added Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 3002(b), 58 DCR 6226
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 3032(a), 61 DCR 9990

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-1701.01 and § 4-1704.01.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3032(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3032(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3032(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).